New Jersey, session 222, A1181.
Be It Enacted by the Senate and General Assembly of the State of New Jersey: 1.    a.  A taxpayer shall have the opportunity to indicate on the taxpayers New Jersey gross income tax return that a portion of the taxpayers tax refund or an enclosed contribution shall be deposited in the General Fund. b.    Any costs incurred by the Division of Taxation for collection and administration attributable to this section may be deducted from receipts collected pursuant to this section, as determined by the Director of the Division of Budget and Accounting in the Department of the Treasury.  The State Treasurer shall deposit net contributions collected pursuant to this section into the General Fund. 2.    This act shall take effect immediately and apply to taxable years beginning on or after the January 1 next following enactment.